static/hunspell/15.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәр .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәр .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәр .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O02 0 емсәләр .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl
SFX O02 0 еңсәләр .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl
SFX O02 0 есәләр .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләр .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләр .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙәргә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙәргә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәргә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәргә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәргә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 еләйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙәрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙәрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 емсәләрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңсәләрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 есәләрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 емсәләргә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңсәләргә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 есәләргә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләргә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләргә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 емсәләрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңсәләрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 есәләрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 емсәләрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңсәләрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 есәләрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 емсәләрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңсәләрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 есәләрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәләрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәләрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O02 0 еләйҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O02 0 емдәйгә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңдәйгә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O02 0 еләйгә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйгә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйгә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O02 0 еләйҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O02 0 еләйҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O02 0 еләйҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O02 0 емсәнең .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңсәнең .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Gen
SFX O02 0 есәнең .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәнең .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәнең .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Gen
SFX O02 0 емсәгә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңсәгә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Dat
SFX O02 0 есәгә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәгә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәгә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Dat
SFX O02 0 емсәне .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңсәне .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Acc
SFX O02 0 есәне .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәне .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәне .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Acc
SFX O02 0 емсәнән .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңсәнән .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Abl
SFX O02 0 есәнән .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәнән .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәнән .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Abl
SFX O02 0 емсәлә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңсәлә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Loc
SFX O02 0 есәлә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәлә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәлә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Loc
SFX O02 0 емдәйме .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәйме .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Q
SFX O02 0 еләйме .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйме .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйме .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Q
SFX O02 0 емсәме .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Q
SFX O02 0 еңсәме .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Q
SFX O02 0 есәме .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәме .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәме .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәйҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәйҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O02 0 еләйҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O02 0 емсәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңсәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Indf
SFX O02 0 есәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәйсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еңдәйсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еләйсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәйсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәйсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 емсәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еңсәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 есәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙсәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 егеҙсәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 емдәге .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы
SFX O02 0 еңдәге .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы
SFX O02 0 ендәге .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәге .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәге .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләр .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләр .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләр .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләр .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләр .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләргә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләргә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләргә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләргә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләргә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләрсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләрсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләрсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләрсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләрсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 емдәгенең .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенең .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O02 0 ендәгенең .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенең .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенең .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O02 0 емдәгегә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O02 0 еңдәгегә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O02 0 ендәгегә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгегә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгегә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O02 0 емдәгене .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O02 0 еңдәгене .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O02 0 ендәгене .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгене .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгене .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O02 0 емдәгенән .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенән .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O02 0 ендәгенән .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенән .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенән .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O02 0 емдәгелә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O02 0 еңдәгелә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O02 0 ендәгелә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгелә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгелә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O02 0 емдәгенеңме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенеңме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгенеңме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенеңме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенеңме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгегәме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгегәме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгегәме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгегәме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгегәме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгенеме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенеме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгенеме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенеме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенеме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгенәнме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенәнме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгенәнме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенәнме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенәнме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O02 0 емдәгенеңдер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенеңдер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгенеңдер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенеңдер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенеңдер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгегәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгегәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгегәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгегәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгегәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгенелер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенелер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгенелер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенелер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенелер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгенәндер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенәндер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгенәндер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенәндер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенәндер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгеләлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O02 0 еңдәгеләлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O02 0 ендәгеләлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгеләлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгеләлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O02 0 емдәгенеңсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еңдәгенеңсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ендәгенеңсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгенеңсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгенеңсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 емдәгегәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 еңдәгегәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ендәгегәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 ебеҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O02 0 егеҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
